Georgia, session 2025_26, SB350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing for the compensation of certain county officers and officials of DeKalb
County, approved March 31, 1976 (Ga. L. 1976, p. 3986), as amended, is amended by adding
a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 1.2.
Pursuant to Section 1 of an Act to amend Article 1 of Chapter 6 of Title 15 of the
O.C.G.A., relating to general provisions regarding superior courts, approved May 6, 2024
(Ga. L. 2024, p. 738), as of January 1, 2025, the Stone Mountain Judicial Circuit shall be
known and may be referred to as the DeKalb Judicial Circuit. Any reference in this Act
S. B. 350
- 1 -

SB 350/FA
to the Stone Mountain Judicial Circuit shall be deemed to refer to the DeKalb Judicial
Circuit."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising Sections 2 and 2.1 as follows:
"SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual salary of each of
the officials of DeKalb County listed below shall be the following percentages of the gross
salary as defined in Section 1:
(1) Judge of the Probate Court..................................................................................95%
(2) Clerk of the Superior Court.................................................................................80%
(3) Tax Commissioner...............................................................................................80%
(4) Judge of the Juvenile Court..................................................................................95%
SECTION 2.1.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual salary of each of
the officials of DeKalb County listed below shall be the following percentages of the gross
salary as defined in Section 1:
(1) Chief Executive Officer......................................................................................100%
(2) Members of the Board of Commissioners..............................................................32%"
SECTION 3.
Said Act is further amended by revising Sections 3 and 3.1 as follows:
S. B. 350
- 2 -

SB 350/FA
"SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual salary of each of
the officials of DeKalb County listed below shall be the following percentages of the gross
salary as defined in Section 1:
(1) State Court Judge, Divisions A and B……............................................................95%
(2) State Court Solicitor...............................................................................................95%
(3) Chief Magistrate.....................................................................................................95%
(4) Associate Magistrate...............................................................................................85%
(5) District Attorney....................................................................................................100%
(6) Sheriff…………………………………………………………………………...100%
SECTION 3.1.
(a) The annual salary of the Clerk of the State Court of DeKalb County shall be 90 percent
of the annual salary received by the Clerk of the Superior Court of DeKalb County.
(b) Each part-time associate judge of the Magistrate Court of DeKalb County shall be paid
an hourly rate commensurate with the annual salary provided in this Act to a full-time
associate judge of the Magistrate Court of DeKalb County."
SECTION 4.
Said Act is further amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 3.2.
Each judge of the State Court, Magistrate Court, Probate Court, or Juvenile Court of
DeKalb County and each non-judicial official who pursuant to this Act receives any
compensation from DeKalb County funds shall also receive from DeKalb County the same
fringe benefits provided to all county employees, including but not limited to health
insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, life insurance, flexible benefits, incentives,
S. B. 350
- 3 -

SB 350/FA
and longevity pay. Each judge or official may opt out of any such fringe benefit. Such
fringe benefits shall be calculated based upon the total years of service that the judge or
official has provided as a judge, official, or employee of DeKalb County and shall be
calculated based upon the judge's or official's total compensation from state or DeKalb
County funds. Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify or affect any pension
or retirement plan."
SECTION 5.
(a) Except as provided for in subsection (b) of this section, this Act shall become effective
on June 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this Act shall become effective on August 1, 2025.
SECTION 6.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 350
- 4 -